lrec2010_examples/Adjgen.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Super +mas +fem +m-f +sg +pl ^GA1 ^GA2 ^GA3 ^GA4 ^GA5
LEXICON Root

^GA1 Adj1;
^GA2 Adj2;
!^GA3 Adj3;
!^GA4 Adj4;
^GA5 Adj5;

!Adjectives ending in o
LEXICON Adj1
+Adj+mas:0   Apl;
+Adj+mas:0 Sup1;
+Adj:0 Adv;

!Adjectives ending in a
LEXICON Adj2
+Adj+fem:0   Apl;
+Adj+fem:0  Sup2;

!Other Adjectives
LEXICON Adj5
+Adj:0 Apl;
+Adj:0 Adv;

LEXICON Adv
+Adverb:^mente #;

LEXICON Sup1
+Super:^ísimo Apl;
LEXICON Sup2
+Super:^ísima Apl;

LEXICON Apl
+sg:0 #;
+pl:^s  #;
